Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-469
City of second class or village; merger with city of primary class; officers of merged school district; duties.

Upon a consolidation taking effect as provided in section 79-468, the office and tenure of all members of boards of education and other school district officers of the district which is annexed to and merged into the school district of the city of the primary class shall cease. All the officers of any city or village school district thus annexed having any of the funds, records, books, papers, or property of any kind in their hands or under their control shall immediately deliver the same to such officers of the district to which their district is annexed as are entitled to receive them.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 26, p. 557;

C.S.1922, § 6635;

C.S.1929, § 79-2626;

R.S.1943, § 79-2629;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 221, p. 763;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-534;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 218;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 47.